Louisiana, session 2026, HB955.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:571.36.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§571.36.1. Electronic monitoring provider registration
A. As used in this Section, the following terms have the meaning ascribed
to them:
(1) "Commission" means the Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement
and Administration of Criminal Justice.
(2) "Electronic monitoring provider" or "provider" means any person or
entity or provider that provides electronic monitoring services including but not
limited to global positioning system monitoring, to individuals pursuant to a court
order, condition of bond, probation, parole, or other lawful authority within this state.
B. No person or entity shall provide electronic monitoring services within
this state unless such person or entity is registered with the commission.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1080 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 955
C. An electronic monitoring provider applying for registration shall submit
an application on forms provided by the commission and shall certify in writing all
of the following:
(1) The provider has reviewed and understands the provisions of R.S.
15:571.36 and all applicable laws governing electronic monitoring.
(2) The provider agrees to comply with all statutory requirements and rules
adopted pursuant to this Section.
(3) The equipment and monitoring systems utilized by the provider meet the
standards and operational requirements established by law.
(4) The provider maintains the operational capability to monitor individuals,
detect violations, and report such violations in accordance with law.
D. The provider shall provide identifying business information, including
ownership and principal place of business, designate a registered agent within this
state, and submit to criminal background checks for owners and principal operators.
E. Electronic monitoring providers shall retain all monitoring records,
violation records, device status records, and related documentation for a minimum
of five years and shall make such records available upon lawful request by a court,
law enforcement agency, prosecutorial authority, or other authorized entity.
F. Electronic monitoring providers shall comply with any reporting,
data-sharing, or system participation requirements established by law or by rule of
the commission including participation in any centralized monitoring or oversight
system established by the state.
G. The commission shall maintain the registration status of each electronic
monitoring provider. The commission shall deny, suspend, or revoke the registration
of a provider only upon receipt of official documentation of any of the following:
(1) The provider or its owner has been convicted of, or entered a plea of
guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony offense or any offense directly related to fraud,
public safety, or the provision of electronic monitoring services.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1080 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 955
(2) The provider has been found, by a final administrative or judicial
determination, to be in violation of the provisions of this Section or rules adopted
pursuant to this Section.
H. Any denial, suspension, or revocation shall be conducted in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act, including notice and an opportunity for
hearing.
I. The commission shall not independently investigate criminal conduct of
electronic monitoring providers. If the commission receives information or has
reason to believe that a provider is not in compliance with the provisions of this
Section, the commission shall notify the appropriate prosecutorial authority, law
enforcement agency, or court of competent jurisdiction for review and any action
deemed appropriate.
J. Upon the entry of a conviction or issuance of a final administrative or
judicial determination involving an electronic monitoring provider related to fraud,
public safety, or the provision of monitoring services, notice of such action may be
transmitted to the commission by a court of competent jurisdiction, the office of the
attorney general, a district attorney, or any other law enforcement agency involved
in the action.
K. An electronic monitoring provider shall disclose to the commission on
any conviction or final administrative or judicial determination involving the
provider or its principals related to fraud, public safety, or the provision of
monitoring services. Such disclosure shall include the disposition of the matter and
shall be made within ten days of the final disposition of the proceeding.
Section 2. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this Act which can be given
effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this
Act are hereby declared severable.
Section 3. The provisions of this Act shall become on effective January 1, 2027.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1080 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 955